Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3281
Court action; district, officer, or employee; party litigant; no bond required.

No bond for cost, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any natural resources district or any officer, board, agent, or employee of any such district in any proceeding or court action in which the natural resources district or its officer, board, agent, or employee is a party litigant in its or his or her official capacity.

Laws 1980, LB 884, § 1.